Massachusetts, session 194th, H2570.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 22C of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 74. (a) The colonel may appoint as special state police officers retired uniformed
members who, as the colonel deems necessary, may perform police details or any police duties
arising therefrom during the course of police detail work, whether or not related to the detail
work.
(b) Retired uniformed members appointed as special state police officers under this
section shall:
(i) have retired prior to the date of the appointment as a special state police officer;
(ii) have a state police discharge status of honorable;
(iii) be deemed by the colonel necessary, suitable, qualified and fit to perform the same
essential functions and duties as uniformed members of the department;
of 2

(iv) be certified by the police officer standards and training commission pursuant to
section 4 of chapter 6E;
(v) be subject to or exempt from department rules as determined by the colonel; and
(vi) be equipped, trained and deployed as determined by the colonel.
(c) Appointed retired uniformed members shall, in accordance with sections 91 and 91A
of chapter 32, be at-will employees subject to appointment and removal by the colonel in a
manner consistent with sections 52 and 53 and shall be appointed for a term of 1 year subject to
renewal in the colonel’s sole discretion. Appointed retired uniformed members shall not be
subject to the civil service law or rules, shall not be entitled to any benefits of such law or rules,
but shall, in the performance of assigned duties and for the purposes of section 9A of chapter
258, be deemed a member of the department.
of 2